Virginia statutes. Title 11. Contracts.
Chapter 7. Virginia Public Procurement Act.

§§ 11-35 through 11-80.

Repealed by Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 13, effective October 1, 2001.

Cross references.

For current provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4300

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, c. 844, recodified

Titles 2.1

and 9. In addition, Acts 2001, c. 844, rewrote the Virginia Public Procurement Act, formerly §

11-35

et seq., as §

2.2-4300

et seq. For provisions relating to Acts 2001, c. 844, and the 2001 recodification, see Editor’s note under §

2.2-100

.